New Jersey, session 222, A4023.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In the event that the Board of Public Utilities employs, retains, or engages outside consultants to prepare a report for the board, the board shall include the total cost of the report preparation and the name of the entity that prepared the report on either the cover of the report or the front page of the report. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.